Nevada, session 83, AB465.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 18, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*AB465_R1*

– 2 –
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 12. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 13. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 14. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 15. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 16. 1. A school district or charter school is immune
from civil liability for any incident of harassment by a pupil,
employee or contractor of the school district or charter school if
the school district or charter school demonstrates that it
established, adequately published and enforced a comprehensive
policy to prevent harassment that includes, without limitation:
(a) Protocols that describe specific measures that must be
adhered to in responding to a complaint of an alleged incident of
harassment by a pupil or staff member;
(b) Procedures to address a complaint of an alleged incident of
harassment without exposing the complainant to further harm or
to unreasonable effort or expense;
(c) Regardless of whether the complainant requests an
investigation, a plan to deliver supportive measures to a
complainant not later than 3 days after receiving the complaint of
an alleged incident of harassment; and
(d) Any corrective action that is necessary, appropriate,
delivered promptly and designed to, for an alleged incident of
harassment:
(1) Stop any such incident;
(2) Prevent the recurrence of any such incident; and
(3) Remedy the effects of any such incident.
2. As used in this section, “supportive measures” includes,
without limitation:
(a) Adjusting the schedule of courses of a pupil;
(b) Providing a pupil with accommodations for assignments
and examinations;
(c) Complying with a court order prohibiting contact;
(d) Providing counseling services;
(e) Adjusting participation in school activities or the duties of
an employee or contractor;
(f) Providing a list of providers of counseling or legal services
in the community;
-
*AB465_R1*

– 3 –
(g) Regardless of any requirements concerning the attendance
or grade point average of a pupil, preserving the ability of the
pupil to serve in leadership positions and participate in activities
and educational programs;
(h) As appropriate, excusing any absences of a pupil or
providing a leave of absence to an employee or contractor; and
(i) Increasing the monitoring or supervision of locations or
during activities where an incident of harassment is alleged to
have occurred.
Sec. 17. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 18. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 19. Chapter 396 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 20 to 30, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 20. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 21. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 22. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 23. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 24. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 25. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 26. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 27. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 28. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 29. 1. An institution within the System is immune
from civil liability for any incident of harassment by a student,
employee or contractor of the institution if the institution
demonstrates that it established, adequately published and
enforced a comprehensive policy to prevent harassment that
includes, without limitation:
(a) Protocols that describe specific measures that must be
adhered to in responding to a complaint of an alleged incident of
harassment by a student or staff member;
(b) Procedures to address a complaint of an alleged incident of
harassment without exposing the complainant to further harm or
to unreasonable effort or expense;
(c) Regardless of whether the complainant requests an
investigation, a plan to deliver supportive measures to a
complainant not later than 3 days after receiving the complaint of
an alleged incident of harassment; and
(d) Any corrective action that is necessary, appropriate,
delivered promptly and designed to, for an alleged incident of
harassment:
(1) Stop any such incident;
(2) Prevent the recurrence of any such incident; and
(3) Remedy the effects of any such incident.
-
*AB465_R1*

– 4 –
2. As used in this section, “supportive measures” includes,
without limitation:
(a) Adjusting the schedule of courses of a student;
(b) Providing a student with accommodations for assignments
and examinations;
(c) Complying with a court order prohibiting contact;
(d) Providing counseling services;
(e) Adjusting participation in school activities or the duties of
an employee or contractor;
(f) Providing a list of providers of counseling or legal services
in the community;
(g) Regardless of any requirements concerning the attendance
or grade point average of a student, preserving the ability of the
student to serve in leadership positions and participate in activities
and educational programs;
(h) As appropriate, excusing any absences of a student or
providing a leave of absence to an employee or contractor; and
(i) Increasing the monitoring or supervision of locations or
during activities where an incident of harassment is alleged to
have occurred.
Sec. 30. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 31. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 32. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 33. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 34. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 35. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 36. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 37. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 38. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 39. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 40. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 41. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 42. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB465_R1*